Utah statutes.
16-16-818.   Standards of conduct and liability.

Except as otherwise provided in Section 16-16-820:

(1)  the discharge of the duties of a director or member of a committee of the board of directors is governed by the law applicable to directors of entities organized under Title 3, Uniform Agricultural Cooperative Association Act; and

(2)  the liability of a director or member of a committee of the board of directors is governed by the law applicable to directors of entities organized under Title 3, Uniform Agricultural Cooperative Association Act.



Enacted by Chapter 363, 2008 General Session

